en: Melon jams
es: Mermeladas y confituras de melón, Mermeladas de melón, Confituras de melón
fr: Confitures de melon
hr: Džemovi od dinja
hu: Dinnye lekvár
it: Confetture di melone, Marmellate di melone
nl: Meloenjams
pt: Doces de melão
sv: Melonsylter
tr: Kavun reçeli

en: Mixed fruit jams
de: Multifrucht Konfitüren
es: Mermeladas y confituras multifruta, Mermeladas multifruta, Confituras multifruta
fi: sekoitetut hedelmähillot
fr: Confitures multifruits
hr: Džemovi od miješanog voća
hu: Vegyes gyümölcslekvár
it: Confetture di frutta mista, Marmellate di frutta mista
nl: Multifruitjams
pt: Compotas de mistura de frutos

en: Onion jams
es: Mermeladas y confituras de cebolla, Mermeladas de cebolla, Confituras de cebolla
fr: Confitures d'oignon
hr: Džemovi od luka
hu: Hagyma lekvárok
it: Confetture di cipolle, Marmellate di cipolle
nl: Uienjams

en: Orange and ginger jams
da: Appelsin- og ingefærsyltetøj
sv: Apelsin- och ingefärasylter

en: Peach jams
bg: Конфитюр от праскови
de: Pfirsichmarmeladen
es: Mermeladas y confituras de melocotón, Mermeladas de melocotón, Confituras de melocotón
fi: persikkahillot
fr: Confitures de pêches
hr: Džemovi od breskvi
hu: Őszibarack lekvár, Barack lekvár
it: Confetture di pesca, Marmellate di pesche
ja: 桃ジャム
nl: Perzikenjams
pt: Doces de pêssego
sv: Persikasylter
tr: Şeftali reçeli

en: Pear jams
bg: Конфитюр от круши
de: Birnenmarmelade
es: Mermeladas y confituras de peras, Mermeladas de peras, Confituras de peras
fi: päärynähillot
fr: Confitures de poires
hr: Džemovi od krušaka
hu: Körte lekvár
it: Confetture di pere, Marmellate di pere
nl: Perenjams
pt: Doces de pêra
sv: Päronsylter

en: Plum jams
de: Pflaumenmarmeladen
es: Mermeladas y confituras de ciruela, Mermeladas de ciruela, Confituras de ciruela
fi: luumuhillot
fr: Confitures de prunes
hr: Džemovi od šljiva
hu: Szilva lekvár
it: Confetture di prugne, Marmellate di prugne
nl: Pruimenjams
pt: Doces de ameixa
sv: Plommonsylter

en: Dew jams
fr: Confitures de quetsches, Confiture de quetsches
it: Confetture di susine, Confetture di susine nere, Marmellate di susine

en: Greengage plum jams
fr: Confitures de Reine-Claude
hr: Marmelade od šljiva greengage
hu: Ringlószilva lekvár
it: Confetture di susine verdi, Marmellate di susine verdi
nl: Reine-Claude jams

en: Mirabelle plum jams
fr: Confitures de mirabelles
hr: Džemovi od šljiva mirabelle
hu: Damaszkuszi szilvalekvár
it: Confetture di susine gialle, Marmellate di susine gialle
nl: Mirabellenjams

en: Pumpkin jams
de: Kürbismarmelade
es: Mermeladas y confituras de calabaza, Mermeladas de calabaza, Confituras de calabaza
fr: Confitures de citrouille
hr: Džemovi od bundeve
hu: Tök lekvárok
it: Confetture di zucca, Marmellate di zucca
ja: かぼちゃジャム
nl: Pompoenjams
pt: Doces de abóbora

en: Cabell d'àngel
es: cabello de ángel
fr: Cabell d'àngel

en: Quince jams
bg: Конфитюр от дюли
da: Kvædesyltetøj
de: Quitte Konfitüren
fr: Confitures de coings
hr: Džemovi od dunja
hu: Birs lekvár
it: Confetture di cotogne, Marmellate di cotogne
sv: Kvittensylter

en: Raspberry and rhubarb jams
da: Hindbær- og rabarbersyltetøj
es: Confitura frambuesa y ruibarbo
fi: Vadelma-raparperihillo
it: Confettura lamponi e rabarbaro
sv: Hallon- och rabarbersylter

en: Rhubarb jams
de: Rhabarber-Konfitüre
es: Mermeladas y confituras de ruibarbo, Mermeladas de ruibarbo, Confituras de ruibarbo
fi: raparperihillot
fr: Confitures de rhubarbe
hr: Džemovi od rabarbare
hu: Rebarbara lekvár
it: Confetture al rabarbaro, Marmellate di rabarbaro
nl: Rabarberjams
pt: Doces de ruibarbo

en: Rosehip jams, rosehip jam
bg: Шипков мармалад
de: Hagebutte Konfitüren
fr: Confitures d'églantines, Confiture d'églantines, confitures de gratte-cul, confitures de cynorhodons
hr: Džemovi od šipka
hu: Csipkebogyó lekvár
it: Confetture di rosa canina, Marmellate di rosa canina
nl: Rozenbotteljam
sv: Nyponsylter

en: Sea-buckthorn jams
de: Sanddorn Konfitüren
es: Mermeladas y confituras d'espino amarillo
fi: Tyrnihillot
fr: Confitures d'argousiers
hr: Džemovi od krkavine
it: Confetture di olivello spinoso, Marmellate di olivello spinoso

en: Sweet pepper jams
es: Mermeladas y confituras de pimiento
fr: Confitures de poivron
hr: Džemovi od slatke paprike
it: Confetture di peperoni dolci, Marmellate di peperoni dolci

en: Tomato jams, tomate jams
es: Mermeladas y confituras de tomate, Mermeladas de tomate, Confituras de tomate
fr: Confitures de tomates
hr: Džemovi od rajčice
hu: Paradicsom lekvár
it: Confetture di pomodori, Marmellate di pomodori
ja: トマトジャム
nl: Tomatenjams
tr: Domates reçeli
ur: ٹماٹر جیم

en: Tropical fruit jams
de: Exotische Fruchtmarmeladen
es: Mermeladas y confituras de frutas tropicales, Mermeladas de frutas tropicales, Confituras de frutas tropicales
fi: hillot trooppisista hedelmistä
fr: Confitures de fruits tropicaux, Confitures de fruits exotiques
hr: Džemovi od tropskog voća
hu: trópis gyümölcs lekvár
it: Confetture di frutti tropicali, Marmellate di frutti tropicali
nl: Jams van tropische vruchten
pt: Compotas de frutos tropicais